Illinois, session 104th, HB1244.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $209,000,000, or so much of that sum 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the State Board of Education for costs associated with 7the Healthy School Meals for All Program. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92025.